Maryland, session 2026, HB0334.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Finance and Procurement
13–212.2.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “AFFILIATE” MEANS AN ENTITY WITH A CORPORATE OR LEGAL
RELATIONSHIP WITH THE BIDDER OR OFFEROR, INCLUDING:
(I) SHARED OWNERSHIP OR CONTROL; OR
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0334*

HOUSE BILL 334
(II) AN ECONOMIC RELATIONSHIP OR PARTNERSHIP,
INCLUDING MARKETING OR PROMOTION.
(3) “BIDDER OR OFFEROR” INCLUDES:
(I) ANY DIVISION OF THE BIDDER OR OFFEROR, EVEN IF IT IS
UNRELATED TO THE PROCUREMENT ACTIVITY; AND
(II) AN AFFILIATE OF THE BIDDER OR OFFEROR.
(B) A PROCUREMENT OFFICER SHALL REQUIRE A BIDDER OR OFFEROR, AS
A CONDITION TO SUBMITTING A BID OR PROPOSAL ON A STATE PROCUREMENT, TO
CERTIFY THAT THE BIDDER OR OFFEROR:
(1) IS NOT ENGAGING IN ANY ACTIONS THAT VIOLATE THE U.S.
CONSTITUTION OR THE MARYLAND CONSTITUTION; AND
(2) WILL REFRAIN FROM ENGAGING IN ANY ACTIONS THAT VIOLATE
THE U.S. CONSTITUTION OR THE MARYLAND CONSTITUTION FOR THE DURATION
OF THE CONTRACTUAL OBLIGATIONS.
13–230.
A PROCUREMENT OFFICER SHALL INCLUDE IN A STATE PROCUREMENT
CONTRACT A CLAUSE REQUIRING THE CONTRACTOR TO CERTIFY THAT THE
CONTRACTOR:
(1) IS NOT ENGAGING IN ANY ACTIONS THAT VIOLATE THE U.S.
CONSTITUTION OR THE MARYLAND CONSTITUTION; AND
(2) WILL REFRAIN FROM ENGAGING IN ANY ACTIONS THAT VIOLATE
THE U.S. CONSTITUTION OR THE MARYLAND CONSTITUTION FOR THE DURATION
OF THE CONTRACTUAL OBLIGATIONS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.